Florida, session 2026, HB1547.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
26
27 Section 1. Section 947.148, Florida Statutes, is created
28 to read:
29 947.148 Conditional geriatric release.—
30 (1) The commission shall, in conjunction with the
31 department, establish the conditional geriatric release program.
32 A person in the department's custody is eligible for
33 consideration for release under the conditional geriatric
34 release program when he or she is 65 years of age or older, has
35 served a minimum of 15 years of his or her sentence in the
36 department's custody, and is not under a sentence of death.
37 (2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a
38 person sentenced to the custody of the department may apply to
39 the commission to be considered for conditional geriatric
40 release up to 2 years before reaching eligibility. The
41 commission may grant a request for conditional geriatric release
42 before the person reaches eligibility status, but a person may
43 not be released until the date he or she becomes eligible.
44 (3) A person does not have a right to conditional
45 geriatric release.
46 (4) In determining whether to grant release under this
47 section, the commission shall consider any evidence relevant to
48 public safety, including, but not limited to, all of the
49 following:
50 (a) The underlying offense.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
51 (b) An inmate's criminal history record.
52 (c) An inmate's disciplinary record while incarcerated.
53 (d) Indications of rehabilitation.
54 (e) An inmate's physical and mental health, including his
55 or her mobility.
56 (f) An inmate's prospects and support system upon release.
57
58 The commission may also consider the continued cost to the
59 department to house the inmate; however, no such consideration
60 can outweigh public safety threats.
61 (5) The authority to determine whether to grant
62 conditional geriatric release and establish additional
63 conditions of conditional geriatric release rests solely within
64 the discretion of the commission, in accordance with this
65 section.
66 (6) The conditional geriatric release term of an inmate
67 released under this section is for the remainder of the inmate's
68 sentence, without diminution of sentence for good behavior.
69 (7) Conditional geriatric release may be revoked in
70 accordance with s. 947.141 for a violation of any condition of
71 the release established by the commission, and the releasee's
72 gain-time may be forfeited pursuant to s. 944.28(1).
73 (8) The department and the commission shall adopt rules to
74 administer this section.
75 Section 2. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
76 947.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
77 947.13 Powers and duties of commission.—
78 (1) The commission shall have the powers and perform the
79 duties of:
80 (h) Determining what persons will be released on
81 conditional geriatric release under s. 947.148 or conditional
82 medical release under s. 947.149, establishing the conditions of
83 conditional geriatric release or conditional medical release,
84 and determining whether a person has violated the conditions of
85 conditional geriatric release or conditional medical release and
86 taking action with respect to such a violation.
87 Section 3. Section 947.141, Florida Statutes, is amended
88 to read:
89 947.141 Violations of conditional release, control
90 release, conditional geriatric release, or conditional medical
91 release or addiction-recovery supervision.—
92 (1) If a member of the commission or a duly authorized
93 representative of the commission has reasonable grounds to
94 believe that an offender who is on release supervision under s.
95 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731 has
96 violated the terms and conditions of the release in a material
97 respect, such member or representative may cause a warrant to be
98 issued for the arrest of the releasee; if the offender was found
99 to be a sexual predator, the warrant must be issued.
100 (2) Upon the arrest on a felony charge of an offender who
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
101 is on release supervision under s. 947.1405, s. 947.146, s.
102 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731, the offender must be
103 detained without bond until the initial appearance of the
104 offender at which a judicial determination of probable cause is
105 made. If the trial court judge determines that there was no
106 probable cause for the arrest, the offender may be released. If
107 the trial court judge determines that there was probable cause
108 for the arrest, such determination also constitutes reasonable
109 grounds to believe that the offender violated the conditions of
110 the release. Within 24 hours after the trial court judge's
111 finding of probable cause, the detention facility administrator
112 or designee shall notify the commission and the department of
113 the finding and transmit to each a facsimile copy of the
114 probable cause affidavit or the sworn offense report upon which
115 the trial court judge's probable cause determination is based.
116 The offender must continue to be detained without bond for a
117 period not exceeding 72 hours excluding weekends and holidays
118 after the date of the probable cause determination, pending a
119 decision by the commission whether to issue a warrant charging
120 the offender with violation of the conditions of release. Upon
121 the issuance of the commission's warrant, the offender must
122 continue to be held in custody pending a revocation hearing held
123 in accordance with this section.
124 (3) Within 45 days after notice to the Florida Commission
125 on Offender Review of the arrest of a releasee charged with a
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
126 violation of the terms and conditions of conditional release,
127 control release, conditional geriatric release, conditional
128 medical release, or addiction-recovery supervision, the releasee
129 must be afforded a hearing conducted by a commissioner or a duly
130 authorized representative thereof. If the releasee elects to
131 proceed with a hearing, the releasee must be informed orally and
132 in writing of the following:
133 (a) The alleged violation with which the releasee is
134 charged.
135 (b) The releasee's right to be represented by counsel.
136 (c) The releasee's right to be heard in person.
137 (d) The releasee's right to secure, present, and compel
138 the attendance of witnesses relevant to the proceeding.
139 (e) The releasee's right to produce documents on the
140 releasee's own behalf.
141 (f) The releasee's right of access to all evidence used
142 against the releasee and to confront and cross-examine adverse
143 witnesses.
144 (g) The releasee's right to waive the hearing.
145 (4) Within a reasonable time following the hearing, the
146 commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized
147 representative who conducted the hearing shall make findings of
148 fact in regard to the alleged violation. A panel of no fewer
149 than two commissioners shall enter an order determining whether
150 the charge of violation of conditional release, control release,
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
151 conditional geriatric release, conditional medical release, or
152 addiction-recovery supervision has been sustained based upon the
153 findings of fact presented by the hearing commissioner or
154 authorized representative. By such order, the panel may revoke
155 conditional release, control release, conditional geriatric
156 release, conditional medical release, or addiction-recovery
157 supervision and thereby return the releasee to prison to serve
158 the sentence imposed, reinstate the original order granting the
159 release, or enter such other order as it considers proper.
160 Effective for inmates whose offenses were committed on or after
161 July 1, 1995, the panel may order the placement of a releasee,
162 upon a finding of violation pursuant to this subsection, into a
163 local detention facility as a condition of supervision.
164 (5) Effective for inmates whose offenses were committed on
165 or after July 1, 1995, notwithstanding the provisions of ss.
166 775.08, former 921.001, 921.002, 921.187, 921.188, 944.02, and
167 951.23, or any other law to the contrary, by such order as
168 provided in subsection (4), the panel, upon a finding of guilt,
169 may, as a condition of continued supervision, place the releasee
170 in a local detention facility for a period of incarceration not
171 to exceed 22 months. Prior to the expiration of the term of
172 incarceration, or upon recommendation of the chief correctional
173 officer of that county, the commission shall cause inquiry into
174 the inmate's release plan and custody status in the detention
175 facility and consider whether to restore the inmate to
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
176 supervision, modify the conditions of supervision, or enter an
177 order of revocation, thereby causing the return of the inmate to
178 prison to serve the sentence imposed. The provisions of this
179 section do not prohibit the panel from entering such other order
180 or conducting any investigation that it deems proper. The
181 commission may only place a person in a local detention facility
182 pursuant to this section if there is a contractual agreement
183 between the chief correctional officer of that county and the
184 Department of Corrections. The agreement must provide for a per
185 diem reimbursement for each person placed under this section,
186 which is payable by the Department of Corrections for the
187 duration of the offender's placement in the facility. This
188 section does not limit the commission's ability to place a
189 person in a local detention facility for less than 1 year.
190 (6) Whenever a conditional release, control release,
191 conditional geriatric release, conditional medical release, or
192 addiction-recovery supervision is revoked by a panel of no fewer
193 than two commissioners and the releasee is ordered to be
194 returned to prison, the releasee, by reason of the misconduct,
195 shall be deemed to have forfeited all gain-time or commutation
196 of time for good conduct, as provided for by law, earned up to
197 the date of release. However, if a conditional medical release
198 is revoked due to the improved medical or physical condition of
199 the releasee, the releasee shall not forfeit gain-time accrued
200 before the date of conditional medical release. This subsection
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1547 2026
201 does not deprive the prisoner of the right to gain-time or
202 commutation of time for good conduct, as provided by law, from
203 the date of return to prison.
204 (7) If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to
205 believe that an offender who is on release supervision under s.
206 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731 has
207 violated the terms and conditions of his or her release by
208 committing a felony offense, the officer shall arrest the
209 offender without a warrant, and a warrant need not be issued in
210 the case.
211 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1547-00